Hawaii, session 2025, HB696.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that many low-income households struggle to purchase food due to Hawaii's high cost of living and food prices.  The supplemental nutrition assistance program (SNAP), formerly known as the food stamp program, is crucial to providing necessary food assistance to some of Hawaii's most economically disadvantaged residents. The legislature further finds that SNAP is the most effective anti-hunger initiative in the country.  In Hawaii, SNAP supports over one hundred thirty thousand individuals, bringing more than $630,000,000 into the State's economy each year.  These benefits help economically vulnerable households meet their basic nutritional needs without sacrificing their financial security. The legislature additionally finds that a study co-authored by the university of Hawaii economic research organization and Hawaii Public Health Institute found that eliminating the net income limit criteria for SNAP beneficiaries would provide an additional $45,000,0000 in benefits to struggling families across the State and expand eligibility for thirteen thousand to fourteen thousand more households, with each household receiving an average of $3,200 annually in food assistance.  Subsequently, in September 2024, Governor Josh Green announced that the State would remove the net income limit criteria to strengthen Hawaii's social welfare system for working-class families. The legislature also finds that SNAP access and participation rates are hampered by understaffing at the department of human services.  Improvements to SNAP in the State, including elimination of the net income limit, will only be effective if they are able to be fully implemented, which will require additional staffing for the department of human services.  Moreover, since SNAP benefits are federally reimbursable, increasing staff for the State's SNAP program could generate hundreds of millions of dollars in federal revenue to combat food insecurity in local communities by strengthening the State's SNAP participation rate. The legislature also finds that the State does not participate in the elderly simplified application project, which is a demonstration project that seeks to increase participation among the older adult low-income population facing barriers to participation in SNAP.  Specifically, the demonstration project waives the recertification interview requirement, allows for greater flexibility in verification, and extends the certification period to thirty-six months. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Require the department of human services to adjust the minimum certification periods for supplemental nutrition assistance program benefits households, participate in the elderly simplified application project, and report to the legislature; and (2)  Appropriate funds to the department of human services to enhance staffing related to the supplemental nutrition assistance program. SECTION 2.  (a) The department of human services shall set the minimum certification periods for supplemental nutrition assistance program benefit households to twelve months; provided that for households in which all adult members are sixty years of age or older, the certification periods shall be at minimum twenty-four months. (b)  The department of human services shall participate in the elderly simplified application project of the supplemental nutrition assistance program to simplify eligibility determinations for eligible households.  Participation in the elderly simplified application project shall include: (1)  Establishing recertification periods of a least thirty-six months for households composed entirely of adults sixty years of age or older or adults with disabilities; and (2)  Waiving the recertification interview for eligible households, to the extent allowed by federal law. (c)  The department of human services shall seek any necessary federal approvals or waivers to implement the provisions of this section and shall promptly amend its rules, policies, and procedures to effectuate the intent of this section. (d)  The department of human services shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027 that shall include: (1)  Data on the implementation and utilization of the supplemental nutrition assistance program and elderly simplified application project, including the number and characteristics of participating households; (2)  Administrative cost savings or changes; and (3)  Analysis of the participation rates. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to strengthen access to the supplemental nutrition assistance program by: (1)  Authorizing differential pay increases for positions related to the facilitation of the supplemental nutrition assistance program; (2)  Establishing new positions to improve access to the supplemental nutrition assistance program, particularly for economically disadvantaged communities; and (3)  Undertaking any other programs or initiatives the department of human services deems effective in improving supplemental nutrition assistance program participation rates. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of human services for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________